Utah statutes.
78B-6-1310.   Mortgage not considered a conveyance -- Foreclosure necessary.

A mortgage of real property may not be considered a conveyance which would enable the owner of the mortgage to recover possession of the real property without a foreclosure and sale.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

